Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-1571
Scald prevention device; violation; penalty.

Anyone who installs four or more showers or bathtubs, in a single building, in violation of section 71-1569 shall be guilty of a Class V misdemeanor.

Laws 1987, LB 264, § 3.